Maryland, session 2026, HB1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–535.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND POLICE
TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1359*

HOUSE BILL 1359
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN THE STATE SHALL SUBMIT THE AGENCY’S
POLICY REGARDING PURSUIT OF FLEEING SUSPECTS TO THE COMMISSION.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, AND EACH JUNE 1 THEREAFTER, THE
COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF PURSUITS OF FLEEING SUSPECTS INITIATED;
(2) THE REASON FOR INITIATING EACH PURSUIT;
(3) THE OUTCOME OF EACH PURSUIT, INCLUDING WHETHER A
SUSPECT WAS APPREHENDED;
(4) THE REASONS FOR TERMINATING EACH PURSUIT;
(5) ANY INJURIES OR FATALITIES SUSTAINED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS, SUSPECTS, OR BYSTANDERS;
(6) ANY COMMON ISSUES RELATING TO PURSUITS OF FLEEING
SUSPECTS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(7) ANY OTHER RELEVANT DATA OR ANALYSIS; AND
(8) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR BEST PRACTICES AND POLICY
IMPROVEMENTS RELATING TO PURSUITS OF FLEEING SUSPECTS.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL
DEVELOP A MODEL POLICY FOR POLICE PURSUITS OF FLEEING SUSPECTS.
(2) THE MODEL POLICY SHALL PRIORITIZE PROTECTING THE LIVES
AND SAFETY OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND BYSTANDERS.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT THE MODEL POLICY TO EACH
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN THE STATE AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN THE
STATE SHALL ADOPT A POLICY FOR POLICE PURSUITS OF FLEEING SUSPECTS THAT

HOUSE BILL 1359 3
MEETS OR EXCEEDS THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THE MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED
BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.